Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-9002
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-9002 to 71-9005 shall be known and may be cited as the Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Assistance Act.

Laws 2025, LB78, § 1.